North Carolina, session 2025, HB1041.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The following described property, identified by Carteret County
Parcel Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the City of Morehead City:
638714442765000, 638714440096000, and 638714444512000.
SECTION 1.(b) This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens to the City of
Morehead City for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date
of this act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Morehead City.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the territory
described in Section 1(a) of this act as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
*H1041-v-1*